Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Chapter 4

State Chemical Laboratory [Transferred]

43-4-101 — 43-4-106. [Transferred.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, §§ 43-4-101 — 43-4-106, concerning the state chemical laboratory, was transferred to ch. 1, part 4 of this title in 1987.

The subsequent sections (ch. 1, part 4 of this title) were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 878, § 20.